Wyoming, session 2025, HB0237.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-2-204(a), (b) and (f), 31-2-213(b)
and (h)(viii), 31-2-215(c), 31-2-216(a), 31-2-217(a), (j)
and (m), 31-2-218(b), 31-2-220(b), 31-2-222, 31-2-223(c),
31-2-229(d), 31-2-230(c), 31-2-231(c) and 31-2-232(c) are
amended to read:
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678

31-2-204. Issuance of certificates of registration
and license plates by county; form.

(a) Upon receipt of an approved application and
payment of fees the county treasurer shall issue to the
applicant a certificate of registration conforming with the
facts set forth in the application together with and not
later than thirty (30) days after the application is
approved the department shall issue one (1) license plate
or validation sticker for motorcycles, multipurpose
vehicles, trailers, including house trailers, and vehicles
operated with dealer license plates and to the applicant if
the vehicle being registered does not have a front plate
bracket or two (2) license plates or proper validation
stickers for any other vehicle to the applicant if a front
plate bracket is present on the vehicle being registered as
indicated on the application. A physical or electronic
copy of the certificate of registration shall be carried at
all times in the motor vehicle for which it is valid and
shall be displayed upon demand of any peace officer. A
certificate of registration issued by a county treasurer
may be provided in electronic form.
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678

(b) Except as otherwise provided, license plates
shall be of metal not less than twelve (12) inches long in
the left-hand end of which shall be arabic numerals for the
county in which issued, followed by the bucking horse and
rider emblem and a distinctive number assigned to the
vehicle, set forth in numerals and letters as determined by
the department and above or underneath such numerals shall
be the word "Wyoming" and arabic numerals for the year of
issue or validation. License plates issued to dealers and
for state or federal official forestry vehicles,
motorcycles, multipurpose vehicles and trailers shall
contain appropriate identification which may be in lieu of
the bucking horse and rider emblem. After the county number
on the left-hand end, the license plate may also contain a
distinctive symbol or letters, as determined by the
department, indicating vehicle type. License plates shall
be changed or validated annually. There shall be a marked
contrast between the color of the plate and that of the
numerals and letters and the background of all plates shall
be fully reflectorized. Plates for light utility trailers
under one thousand (1,000) pounds, motorcycles and
multipurpose vehicles shall not be less than three (3)
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
inches wide and six (6) inches long. Antique license plates
shall bear no date and shall bear the inscription "Pioneer
Wyo". Distinctive license farm stickers shall be issued by
the county treasurer department upon request for trucks and
trailers used by any farmer or rancher for the
transportation of livestock, feed or unprocessed
agricultural products owned and produced by the farmer or
rancher from the place of production to market and of ranch
supplies intended solely for the use of the farmer or
rancher, and not for sale, on the return trip, and not for
the transportation of goods and persons for hire. Farm
stickers shall bear the inscription "Farm".

(f) Any person may apply for one (1) set of decals
for breast cancer awareness for any license plate issued
under this article. A decal supporting breast cancer
awareness shall bear the breast cancer ribbon symbol and
shall be attached in the lower left corner of the license
plate without obscuring any other symbols, letters or
numbers on the license plate. Application forms shall be
available at all county treasurer's offices. Each applicant
for a decal under this subsection shall submit an
administration fee with the application. The fee shall be
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
in an amount determined by the department to be sufficient
to recover reasonable administrative costs of the decal,
but not more than five dollars ($5.00) per set of decals
for any one (1) vehicle. Upon completion of the
application, receipt of the administration fee and issuance
or renewal of a license plate under this article, the
county treasurer department shall issue to the applicant
the number of decals corresponding to the number of license
plates issued or renewed. Decals issued under this
subsection shall not be required to be renewed upon renewal
of a license plate. The replacement fee for a decal under
this subsection shall be the same as for the original
decal.

31-2-213. Department to supply registration
certificates, plates and stickers; removable windshield
placards.

(b) The department may issue license plates, except
permanent, dealer and antique motor vehicle license plates,
which shall be valid, for not more than eight (8) years if
annual validation stickers are attached in the upper left
corner of the license plate with the month and year of
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
expiration clearly visible, until the numbers or letters on
the plate are no longer readable or recognizable by a peace
officer as defined by W.S. 7-2-101. If a license plate has
been determined to be unreadable or unrecognizable, a
person shall apply to the department for a replacement
license plate in a manner and on a form prescribed by the
department. The department shall establish a fee for a
replacement license plate under this subsection. Department
authorized license plates and annual stickers shall be of
colors that are readily distinguishable from the previous
year.

(h) Effective January 1, 1993, any person eligible
for a special placard under subsection (c) of this section
may apply to the county treasurer for special license
plates for a motor vehicle owned by that person. Special
license plates shall not be issued to any person who is
eligible only for a temporary removable windshield placard
under subsection (g) of this section. Special plates issued
under this subsection are subject to the following:

(viii) The county treasurer department shall
issue a set of plates for each vehicle and a special
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
license plate for each motorcycle or multipurpose vehicle
registered to a qualified applicant under this subsection
upon payment of required fees.

31-2-215. Disabled veteran's license plates.

(c) The county treasurer department shall only issue
one (1) pair of license plates annually that are exempt as
provided by W.S. 31-3-101(b)(xv) to each applicant under
this section.

31-2-216. Special plates; former prisoners of war.

(a) The county treasurer department shall issue one
(1) set of special license plates for either a passenger
car, truck or motor home owned or leased by a former
prisoner of war in accordance with this section for the
year 1988 and thereafter.

31-2-217. Special plates; Pearl Harbor survivors;
national guard members; armed forces veterans; purple heart
recipients; women armed forces veteran decals.

HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
(a) The county treasurer department shall issue one
(1) set of special license plates to each applicant for
either a passenger car, truck, motorcycle, handicapped
motorcycle or motor home owned or leased by a survivor of
Pearl Harbor, a member of the Wyoming army or air national
guard, a purple heart recipient or honorably discharged
veteran of the United States armed forces and, if applied
for and eligible, one (1) set of decals designating the
person is an honorably discharged woman veteran of the
United States armed forces in accordance with this section.
These license plates shall be displayed upon the vehicle
for which they are issued. A decal designating the person
is an honorably discharged woman veteran shall be attached
in the lower left corner of a license plate issued under
this section.

(j) Each applicant for an armed forces special
license plate shall submit an application fee of twenty
dollars ($20.00) upon which the Wyoming veteran's
commission shall issue a written statement establishing the
applicant's eligibility to receive an armed forces license
plate from the county treasurer department. Fees collected
under this subsection shall be deposited into the veterans'
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
commission expendable trust fund. Application for and any
renewal of an armed forces special license plate shall be
subject to the requirements of this article and the payment
of the fee required by W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii).

(m) The decal designating a woman veteran of the
United States armed forces shall bear a distinctive symbol
or letters identifying the registrant as an honorably
discharged woman veteran of the United States armed forces.
Each applicant for a decal under this subsection shall
submit an administration fee with the application. The fee
shall be in an amount determined by the department to be
sufficient to recover reasonable administrative costs of
the decal, but not more than five dollars ($5.00) per set
of decals for any one (1) vehicle. Upon completion of the
application, receipt of the administration fee,
determination of eligibility and issuance or renewal of
special license plates under this section, the county
treasurer department shall issue to the applicant the
number of decals corresponding to the number of license
plates issued or renewed under this section to be attached
to the license plates issued or renewed under this section.
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
The replacement fee for a decal under this subsection shall
be the same as for the original decal.

31-2-218. Firefighter's license plates.

(b) Application for license plates under subsection
(a) of this section shall be annually made to the county
treasurer as provided by this article. The written
statement of eligibility required under subsection (a) of
this section shall be presented to the county treasurer
before a license plate may be issued by the department,
provided that the written statement shall only be required
for a retired firefighter at the time of first application
and shall not be required for renewals or subsequent
applications by the same retired firefighter. Application
forms shall be available at all county treasurer's offices.
The fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall
accompany each application.

31-2-220. Emergency medical technician's license
plates.

HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
(b) Application for license plates under subsection
(a) of this section shall be annually made to the county
treasurer as provided by this article. A written statement
of eligibility, accompanied by a copy of the applicant's
current emergency medical technician certification, shall
be presented to the county treasurer before a license plate
or renewal sticker may be issued by the department.
Application forms shall be available at all county
treasurer's offices. The normal registration fees and the
fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall accompany
each application. A person issued distinctive license
plates pursuant to this section who is no longer a
certified emergency medical technician shall apply for
regular license plates pursuant to this article before
registration of the vehicle expires.

31-2-222. Radio amateur license plates.

A resident who is the owner of a motor vehicle that is not
a commercial vehicle or multipurpose vehicle and who is
licensed by the federal communications commission to engage
in private and experimental two-way radio operation and
holding a bona fide novice class license or higher may
HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
apply to the department for radio amateur license plates
for one (1) passenger car and one (1) pickup truck only
whereby the distinctive license plate number assigned to
the motor vehicles shall consist of the figures and letters
that make up the call sign of the radio amateur as issued
by the federal communications commission. Upon payment of
the regular registration fees and the additional radio
amateur license plate fee the department shall furnish
radio amateur license plates of such size and design as
prescribed by the department to the county treasurer of the
county in which the approved applicant resides. The county
treasurer shall issue the plates to the applicant. upon
payment of the regular registration fees. A request for
renewal of the registration for the radio amateur license
plate may be made to a county treasurer for issuance of a
renewal registration and validation sticker. The department
may promulgate rules and regulations as provided by the
Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to implement the
provisions of this section.

31-2-223. Antique motor vehicles.

HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
(c) Upon receipt of an approved application and
payment of fees the vehicle shall be registered and license
plates shall be issued therefor by the department. The
registration expires upon transfer of ownership of the
vehicle. Notwithstanding W.S. 31-2-205(a)(i)(A), a license
plate shall only be required to be displayed on the rear of
those antique motor vehicles that were originally
manufactured to have one (1) license plate.

31-2-229. Special plates; gold star.

(d) The department shall prescribe the design of the
gold star license plate authorized by this section in
consultation with the Wyoming veteran's commission and
shall arrange for production of the license plates.
Following initial approval, the gold star license plates
shall be subject to redesign on the same schedule as all
license plates beginning with the year 2017 reissuance.
The license plates shall be issued by the county treasurer
of each county department.

31-2-230. Tribal license plates.

HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
(c) The department shall arrange for production of
the license plates authorized by this section. The county
treasurer of each county department shall issue the license
plates.

31-2-231. Wildlife conservation license plates;
wildlife conservation account; authority to receive and
expend monies.

(c) Applicants shall apply at least thirty (30) days
before registration is required for the vehicle for which
the plates are intended. Except as provided in this
section, application for, issuance and renewal of the
wildlife conservation license plates under this section
shall be subject to the same requirements and fees as
provided in this article in addition to the fee collected
under subsection (a) of this section. The license plate
fees required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(viii) shall accompany
each application. The license plates under this section
shall be issued by the county treasurer of each county
department and shall be displayed only upon the vehicle for
which they are issued.

HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
31-2-232. Specified off-road vehicle licensing and
registration.

(c) Upon receipt of an approved application and
payment of fees the county treasurer department shall issue
to the applicant a certificate of registration together
with one (1) license plate or validation sticker. The
registration fee for off-road recreational vehicles shall
be the same rate as for motorcycles. The registration
expires annually in accordance with W.S. 31-2-206(a) and
upon transfer of ownership of the vehicle. License plates
on the off-road recreational vehicle shall be displayed in
accordance with W.S. 31-2-205.

Section 2. The department of transportation shall
adopt rules necessary to implement this act not later than
January 1, 2027.

HB0237

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0678
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective January 1,
2027.

(END)
HB0237